nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Windfoiling > Windfoil-utstyr: Windfoil – bærevesker og deksler; Fotstropper til vindfoiling; Trapesliner til vindfoiling; Leasher til vindfoiling; Windfoiling – beskyttelsesutstyr
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Windfoiling > Dodaci za windfoiling: Torbe i navlake za opremu za windfoiling; Trake za windfoiling; Konopci za pojaseve za windfoiling; Povodci za windfoiling; Zaštitna oprema za windfoiling
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Windfoiling > Accesorii pentru windfoil: Genți și huse de transport pentru windfoil; Curelușe de picior pentru windfoil; Linii de ham pentru windfoil; Cabluri de siguranță pentru windfoil; Echipamente de protecție pentru windfoiling
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Windfoiling > Windfoil-tillbehör: Windfoil bärväskor och fodral; Fotband för vindfoiling; Hängselelinor för vindfoiling; Leashar för vindfoiling; Skyddsutrustning för windfoiling
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Виндфойлинг > Аксессуары для виндфойлинга: Сумки и чехлы для виндфойлинга; Петли для ног для виндфойлинга; Трапеционные концы для виндфойлинга; Лиши для виндфойлинга; Защитная экипировка для виндфойлинга
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Windfoiling > Zubehör für Windfoiling: Tragetaschen & Hüllen für Windfoiling; Windfoil-Fußschlaufen; Windfoil-Trapeztampen; Windfoil-Leashes; Schutzausrüstung für Windfoiling
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Уиндфойл > Аксесоари за уингфойл: Чанти и калъфи за уингфойл; Каишки за крака за уиндфойл; Въжета за уиндфойл; Каишки за уиндфойл; Защитна екипировка за уингфойл
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Windfoiling > Akcesoria do windfoila: Torby i pokrowce na windfoil; Paski na stopy do windfoila; Linki trapezowe do windfoila; Leashe do windfoila; Stroje ochronne do windfoilingu
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt ván gió > Phụ kiện lướt ván gió: Túi đựng và vỏ lướt ván gió; Dây cài chân windfoil; Dây đai windfoil; Dây buộc windfoil; Đồ bảo hộ môn lướt ván gió
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Windfoiling > Tilbehør til windfoil: Bæretasker og afskærmning til windfoil; Fodstropper til windfoil; Trapeztove til windfoil; Leashes til windfoil; Beskyttelsesudstyr til windfoil
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Szélszörfözés > Szélszörfözési kiegészítők: Szélszörfözési hordtáskák és takarók; Windfoil lábtartó pántok; Windfoil trapézkötelek; Windfoil biztonsági kötelek (leash); Szélszörfözési védőfelszerelés
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Windfoil > Accessoires pour windfoil: Sacs de transport et housses de windfoil; Footstraps de windfoil; Bouts de harnais de windfoil; Leashes de windfoil; Équipement de protection pour le windfoil
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Siipilautailu > Siipilautailuvarusteet: Siipilautailukantolaukut ja -suojat; Windfoil-jalkalenkit; Windfoil-trapetsinarut; Windfoil-karkuremmit; Siipilautailun suojavarusteet
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Orlenčių sportas > Orlenčių priedai: Orlenčių krepšiai ir uždangalai; Windfoil pėdų dirželiai; Windfoil diržų linijos; Aitvaravimo pavadėliai; Orlenčių apsauginės priemonės
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Windfoiling > Αξεσουάρ Windfoil: Τσάντες & καλύμματα μεταφοράς Windfoil; Δέστρες ποδιών windfoil; Σχοινιά γάντζου (harness lines) windfoil; Ιμάντες ασφαλείας (leashes) windfoil; Εξοπλισμός προστασίας Windfoiling
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Windfoil > Acessórios de windfoil: Sacos e capas de transporte para windfoil; Alças de pés para windfoil; Cabos de arnês para windfoil; Leashes para windfoil; Equipamento de proteção para windfoil
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Windfoiling > Windfoil accessoires: Windfoiltassen en hoezen; Windfoil-voetbanden; Windfoil-trapezelijnen; Windfoil-leashes; Windfoilbeschermingsuitrusting
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Windfoiling > Príslušenstvo k windfoilingu: Tašky a obaly na windfoiling; Popruhy na nohy pre windfoil; Lano na postroj pre windfoil; Bezpečnostné popruhy pre windfoil; Ochranné vybavenie k windfoilingu
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 水翼風翼 > 水翼風翼配件: 水翼風翼提袋與外罩; 風帆水翼腳套; 風帆水翼掛鉤線; 風帆水翼腳繩; 水翼風翼護具
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Windfoiling > Windfoil – doplňky: Windfoil – přepravní tašky a obaly; Poutka pro windfoil; Úvazky k postrojům pro windfoil; Leashe pro windfoil; Windfoiling – ochranné pomůcky
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 윈드포일링 > 윈드포일 액세서리: 윈드포일 캐리백 및 커버; 윈드포일 풋스트랩; 윈드포일 하네스 라인; 윈드포일 리시; 윈드포일 보호 장비
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Windfoil > Windfoil Aksesuarları: Windfoil Taşıma Çantaları ve Kılıfları; Windfoil ayak kayışları; Windfoil trapez ipleri; Windfoil leash'leri; Windfoil Koruyucu Donanımı
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > ウィンドフォイル > ウィンドフォイルアクセサリー: ウィンドフォイルキャリーバッグ・カバー; ウィンドフォイル用フットストラップ; ウィンドフォイル用ハーネスライン; ウィンドフォイル用リーシュ; ウィンドフォイル用プロテクター
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > วินด์ฟอยล์ > อุปกรณ์วินด์ฟอยล์: กระเป๋าใส่และที่ครอบวินด์ฟอยล์; สายรัดเท้ากระดานวินด์ฟอยล์; สายฮาร์เนสวินด์ฟอยล์; สายรัดข้อเท้าวินด์ฟอยล์; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับวินด์ฟอยล์
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Windfoiling > Windfoil Accessories: Windfoil Carry Bags & Covers; Windfoil Footstraps; Windfoil Harness Lines; Windfoil Leashes; Windfoiling Protective Gear
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Windfoiling > Acessórios de windfoil: Bolsas e capas de transporte para windfoil; Alças de pé para windfoil; Cabos de arnês para windfoil; Leashes para windfoil; Equipamentos de proteção para windfoil
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Windfoil > Accessori per windfoil: Borse da trasporto e coperture per windfoil; Strap da windfoil; Cime del trapezio da windfoil; Leash da windfoil; Attrezzatura protettiva per windfoil
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Jadranje s foilom > Dodatki za jadranje s foilom: Torbe in prevleke za jadranje s foilom; Nožni trakovi za hidrokrilno windsurfanje; Vrvice za hidrokrilno windsurfanje; Varnostne vrvi za jadranje s foilom; Zaščitna oprema za jadranje s foilom
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 风帆冲浪 > 风帆冲浪配件: 风帆冲浪运输袋与保护套; 风帆水翼脚套; 风帆水翼安全带绳; 风帆水翼脚绳; 风帆冲浪防护装备
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Windfoiling > Accesorios para windfoil: Fundas y bolsas de transporte para windfoil; Cinchas para windfoil; Cabos de arnés para windfoil; Correas para windfoil; Equipo de protección para el windfoiling